Louisiana, session 2026, HB1028.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1257.2(C) through (E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1257.2. Nonemergency medical transportation services
* * *
C. The department shall promulgate and adopt rules establishing a Medicaid
reimbursement rate methodology that provides for a minimum rate of fourteen
dollars and fifty cents per trip and two dollars and ten cents per mile for NEMT
services, including wheelchair-accessible NEMT.
D. The department shall promulgate rules to establish a NEMT rate
methodology for multiple passenger trips based on the number of passengers being
transported.
E. The department shall not allow an individual to be transported via NEMT
to a Medicaid covered service outside of the individual's parish of residence or
contiguous parishes unless there is a determination of medical necessity by the
Medicaid managed care organization or the department.
Section 2. Not later than ninety days after the effective date of this Act the Louisiana
Department of Health shall take all necessary actions including but not limited to filing a
Medicaid state plan amendment, to implement the provisions of this Act.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1028 ENROLLED
Section 3.(A) The provisions of Sections 1and 2 of this Act shall become effective
when an Act of the Louisiana Legislature containing a specific appropriation of monies for
the implementation of the provisions of this Act becomes effective.
(B) The provisions of this Section shall become effective upon signature by the
governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become
law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the
legislature, the provisions of this Section shall become effective on the day following such
approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.